Washington statutes.
RCW 36.34.330

Exchange for privately owned real property of equal value.

The board of county commissioners of any county shall have authority to exchange county real property for privately owned real property of equal value whenever it is determined by a decree of the superior court in the county in which the real property is located, after publication of notice of hearing is given as fixed and directed by such court, that:

(1) The county real property proposed to be exchanged is not necessary to the future foreseeable needs of such county; and

(2) The real property to be acquired by such exchange is necessary for the future foreseeable needs of such county; and

(3) The value of the county real property to be exchanged is not more than the value of the real property to be acquired by such exchange.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 21 s 1.]